Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1322.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Solar-Ready Warehouse and Distribution Center Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person applying for a waiver from the solar-ready requirements under section 3."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Eligible project costs." Costs related to the purchase and 123456789101112131415161718 installation of equipment directly related to a retrofit project for a solar-ready warehouse or distribution center."Large-scale warehouse or distribution center." A warehouse or distribution center with a floor area that is at least 100,000 square feet."Local taxing authority." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, institution district or school district having authority to levy real property taxes."Retrofit project." A project involving a change in design, construction or equipment already in operation in order to incorporate later improvements."Solar-ready." With respect to a building, designed and constructed in a manner that facilitates and optimizes the installation of solar photovoltaic panels on the roof of the building or other areas of the building."Warehouse or distribution center." As follows:(1) A building or group of buildings on the same lot used for the indoor storage of goods, products and materials or the receipt of bulk products and separation and distribution of those products to another warehouse or to individual end-user consumers.(2) The term includes value-added services between a supplier and its customers, such as breaking down of large orders from a single source into smaller orders, product mixing, sorting, packaging, cross-docking, order fulfillment, order returns or the consolidation of several orders into one large order for distribution to several recipients.Section 3. Solar-ready requirements.(a) Applicability.--This section applies to each large-scale warehouse or distribution center for which construction is 20260SB1322PN1707 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commenced on or after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Large-scale warehouse or distribution center.--Each large-scale warehouse or distribution center shall be solar-ready.(c) Design.--Solar-ready design shall include the following features:(1) A minimum of 40% of the roof area designated as suitable for solar photovoltaic installation, free from obstructions such as HVAC systems, vents or other equipment.(2) Structural integrity sufficient to support the installation of solar photovoltaic systems, accounting for the weight of panels, mounting systems and potential wind or snow loads.(3) Conduit pathways from the roof to the electrical room of the building to accommodate wiring for solar energy systems.(4) An appropriately sized space in the electrical room of the building for solar energy inverters and related equipment.Section 4. Waivers.(a) Grant of waiver request.--The department may grant to an applicant a waiver from the solar-ready requirements under section 3 only under the following conditions:(1) The applicant demonstrates that the physical characteristics of the site make compliance technically infeasible, including:(i) Shading from an adjacent building, terrain or vegetation that permanently obstructs sufficient solar access.(ii) Structural constraints specific to the building 20260SB1322PN1707 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site, such as poor soil conditions requiring extensive and cost-prohibitive engineering modifications.(2) The applicant demonstrates that the additional costs incurred to meet the requirements arise solely from the extraordinary site conditions or external factors beyond the typical scope of construction for a warehouse or distribution center and exceed a defined financial threshold, such as 10% of the total construction budget.(b) Denial or waiver request.--The following considerations shall not be grounds for a waiver under this section:(1) General compliance costs associated with meeting the solar-ready requirements under section 3.(2) The applicant's perceived market feasibility, tenant demand or return on investment.(3) Financial hardship related to the overall construction project unless directly attributable to the characteristics, conditions or external factors described in subsection (a).(c) Requirements for applicant seeking waiver.--An applicant seeking a waiver under this section must:(1) Submit a detailed report prepared by a licensed engineer or architect documenting the specific site constraints or cost factors that make compliance infeasible or disproportionately expensive.(2) Provide itemized cost estimates from at least two independent contractors or experts to substantiate claims of undue financial burden.(3) Include a signed affidavit attesting that the claimed hardship arises solely from site-specific or technical limitations, not general construction or market 20260SB1322PN1707 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 considerations.(d) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Prescribe the form and manner for submitting a waiver request under this section.(2) Establish specific guidelines for evaluating waiver requests, including definitions of "extraordinary site conditions" and standardized thresholds for cost assessments.(3) Provide a written decision on all waiver requests, including an explanation of the reasons for granting or denying a waiver.Section 5. Guidance.The department shall issue guidance documents to assist developers and construction professionals in complying with this act.Section 6. Prevailing wage.An employer or contractor contracted to complete a solar-ready project in accordance with this act shall pay the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for all crafts or classifications performing construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration and repair work, other than maintenance work, on the project as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, and as bid under the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), referred to as the Separations Act.Section 7. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Enforcement.--The department shall have the authority to inspect construction plans and completed buildings to ensure compliance with this act.(b) Penalty.--A person that violates this act shall be 20260SB1322PN1707 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100,000 for each violation.Section 8. Tax exemptions and special tax provisions.(a) Authorization.--Each local taxing authority may provide a tax exemption or special tax provision related to an increase in the value of real estate resulting from retrofit projects of a warehouse or distribution center within the boundaries of the local taxing authority.(b) Approval required.--A tax exemption or special tax provision authorized under this section is not enforceable until the governing body of a local taxing authority with jurisdiction to levy real estate taxes on a property has approved an ordinance or resolution adopting the tax exemption or special tax provision. Other similarly situated local taxing authorities may subsequently approve a tax exemption or special tax provision.(c) Notice.--(1) Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution authorizing a tax exemption or special tax provision under this section by a local taxing authority, the local taxing authority shall post a notice of the adoption in a newspaper of general circulation in the area. The local taxing authority may also post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website, if available.(2) Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution authorizing a tax exemption or special tax provision under this section by multiple local taxing authorities having mutual jurisdiction to levy real estate taxes on a property, a joint notice of adoption of the tax exemption or special tax provision shall be published in a newspaper of general 20260SB1322PN1707 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circulation in the area. Each local taxing authority that comprises the group of multiple local taxing authorities shall also post a notice of the adoption on its publicly accessible Internet website, if available.(d) Amount.--A local taxing authority granting a tax exemption or special tax provision under this section may provide for the tax exemption or special tax provision on the assessment attributable to the actual cost of eligible project costs associated with retrofit projects to construct a solar-ready zone or up to a maximum cost uniformly established by the local taxing authority. The maximum cost shall uniformly apply within the local taxing authority's jurisdiction.(e) Schedule.--Whether or not the assessment eligible for a tax exemption or special tax provision is based upon actual cost or a maximum cost, the amount of taxes exempted shall be in accordance with the schedule of taxes exempted established by the local taxing authority subject to the following limitations:(1) The length of the schedule of taxes exempted shall not exceed 10 years.(2) The schedule of taxes exempted shall stipulate the portion of eligible project costs to be exempted each year.(3) The exemption from taxes shall be limited to the additional assessment valuation attributable to the actual costs of new construction or improvements to a warehouse or distribution center or not more than the maximum cost established by the local taxing authority.(f) Sale or exchange.--A tax exemption or special tax provision under this section shall be upon the subject property and shall not terminate upon the sale or exchange of the property.20260SB1322PN1707 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Procedure for obtaining tax exemption or special tax provision.--A person desiring a tax exemption or special tax provision for the eligible costs associated with retrofit projects to construct a solar-ready zone as authorized by an ordinance or resolution adopted under this act must notify the appropriate local taxing authority in writing on an application form provided by the local taxing authority. The application form must be submitted at the time that the person secures the building permit for the property or, if no building permit or other notification is required for the redevelopment of the property, at the time that the person commences construction.(h) Amendment of ordinance or resolution.--The amounts and schedules under subsections (d) and (e) in effect at the time of an initial request for a tax exemption or special tax provision shall govern the initial request, and any subsequent amendment of the applicable ordinance or resolution affecting the amounts or schedules shall not apply to the initial request.Section 9. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt or promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act, including technical specifications for solar-ready design and construction.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1322PN1707 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324